Oklahoma, session 2026, SB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3260 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:





Req. No. 1075 Page 1


1. “Contract” means any agreement for the acquisition by


purchase, lease, or barter of property or services by a foreign


source for the direct benefit or use of either of the parties;


2. “Covered institution” means any institution of higher


education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education or a


private institution of higher education located within this state


and accredited pursuant to Section 4103 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


3. “Foreign source” means:


a. a foreign government including an agency of a foreign


government,


b. a legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created


solely under the laws of a foreign government,


c. an individual who is not a citizen or a national of


the United States or a trust territory or protectorate


thereof, and


d. an agent including a subsidiary or affiliate of a


foreign legal entity acting on behalf of a foreign


source; and


4. “Reportable funding” means any contract, gift, grant,


endowment, award, or donation or payment in exchange for services,


capital investment, salary, wage, compensation, fee, or other


monetary exchange including any pledge, promise, agreement, or


expressed intention by a foreign source to provide funding which

Req. No. 1075 Page 2


exceeds Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) in value or is expected


to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) in value over the


projected length of the funding relationship between the covered


institution and a foreign source.


B. Except as provided for in subsection E of this section, each


covered institution shall provide on the first day of each calendar


quarter a report detailing all reportable funding received by the


covered institution from a foreign source during the previous


calendar quarter. The report shall include:


1. The amount of reportable funding received;


2. A description of the type of reportable funding and the


purpose thereof including whether the funding reported is part of an


ongoing relationship with the foreign source;


3. A detailed description of the foreign source providing the


funding including the name and address of the entity or individual


providing the funding; and


4. A copy of any contract, agreement, pledge, or memorandum of


understanding associated with the funding.


C. The report required by subsection B of this section shall be


a public record subject to the Oklahoma Open Records Act and shall


be timely posted and regularly updated on the covered institution’s


website. A copy of the report shall be electronically submitted to


the Governor and the chairs of the Senate and House of



Req. No. 1075 Page 3


Representatives committees with responsibility over higher


education.


D. Willful failure of the covered institution to include


reportable funding in a report required by subsection B of this


section shall subject the covered institution to a fine of up to Ten


Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per incident. The fine amount and the


amount of reportable funding not included in the report required by


subsection B of this section shall be deposited in the General


Revenue Fund. The Attorney General may investigate a covered


institution for noncompliance with the provisions of this section.


E. The provisions of this section shall not apply to payments


made by an individual who would otherwise qualify as a foreign


source for tuition and related fees to support an individual


enrolled as a student at the covered institution.


F. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may


promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1075 EB 1/3/2025 10:12:47 AM



Req. No. 1075 Page 4